Wisconsin, session 2025, SB118.
do enact as follows:SB118,14Section 1. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB118,2,2171.07 (12) Specified disaster relocation credit. (a) Definitions. In this 2subsection:SB118,2,331. “Claimant” means a U.S. citizen who files a claim under this subsection.SB118,2,542. “Hurricane Helene” means the hurricane named Helene during the 2024 5Atlantic hurricane season.SB118,2,763. “Los Angeles wildfires of 2025” means the wildfires that occurred between 7January 1, 2025, and January 31, 2025, in the County of Los Angeles, California.SB118,2,984. “Specified disaster” means the Los Angeles wildfires of 2025 or Hurricane 9Helene.SB118,2,1510(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 11ending before January 1, 2026, and subject to the limitations provided in this 12subsection, a claimant who resided in the County of Los Angeles, California, or the 13state of North Carolina, up until a specified disaster occurred and who moved to 14this state due to the specified disaster may claim as a credit against the tax imposed 15under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, $10,000.SB118,2,2016(c) Limitations. 1. No person may claim the credit under this subsection 17unless the person has filed an income tax return for the taxable year beginning 18after December 31, 2022, and ending before January 1, 2024, and listed a home 19address located in the County of Los Angeles, California, or the state of North 20Carolina on that return.SB118,2,22212. No person who has been convicted in any state or federal court of a felony 22may claim the credit under this subsection.SB118,2,24233. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 24the period specified in s. 71.75 (2).SB118,3,21(d) Administration. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the 2credit under that subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.SB118,23Section 2. 71.10 (4) (ci) of the statutes is created to read:SB118,3,4471.10 (4) (ci) Specified disaster relocation credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB118,3,55